Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2936.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.07, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Pesticide, rinsate, and container disposal. new text begin (a) new text end A person may only dispose of pesticide, rinsate, and pesticide containers in accordance with this chapter and FIFRA. The manner of disposal must not cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment. new text begin (b) A person is prohibited from disposing a pesticide container by burning. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end